Hawaii statutes.
§431:16-207 Board of directors. (a)
The board of directors of the association shall consist of not less than five
nor more than nine member insurers serving terms as established in the plan of
operation. The members of the board shall be selected by member insurers
subject to the approval of the commissioner. Vacancies on the board shall be
filled for the remaining period of the term by a majority vote of the remaining
board members, subject to the approval of the commissioner. To select the
initial board of directors, and initially organize the association, the
commissioner shall give notice to all member insurers of the time and place of
the organizational meeting. In determining voting rights at the organizational
meeting each member insurer shall be entitled to one vote in person or by
proxy. If the board of directors is not selected within sixty days after
notice of the organizational meeting, the commissioner may appoint the initial
members.

(b) In approving selections or in appointing
members to the board, the commissioner shall consider, among other things,
whether all member insurers are fairly represented.

(c) Members of the board may be reimbursed
from the assets of the association for expenses incurred by them as members of
the board of directors but members of the board shall not otherwise be
compensated by the association for their services. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next